New York, session 2025-2026, A8330.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 11-0103 of the environmental conservation law is 2 amended by adding a new subdivision 33 to read as follows: 3 33. "Long bow" includes longbows, recurve bows, compound bows, and 4 crossbows. 5 § 2. Subparagraph 9 of paragraph b of subdivision 4 of section 11-0901 6 of the environmental conservation law, as added by section 6 of part EE 7 of chapter 55 of the laws of 2014, is amended to read as follows: 8 (9) with a crossbow unless such crossbow shall consist of a bow and 9 string, either compound or recurve, [that launches a minimum fourteen 10 inch bolt, not including point,] mounted upon a stock with a trigger 11 that holds the string and limbs under tension until released. The trig- 12 ger unit of such crossbow must have a working safety. The [minimum limb 13 width of such crossbow shall be seventeen inches, have a] minimum peak 14 draw weight of such crossbow shall be one hundred pounds [and a maximum 15 peak draw weight of two hundred pounds. The minimum overall length of 16 such crossbow from buttstock to front of limbs shall be twenty-four 17 inches]. 18 § 3. Subparagraph 9 of paragraph c of subdivision 4 of section 11-0901 19 of the environmental conservation law, as added by section 7 of part EE 20 of chapter 55 of the laws of 2014, is amended to read as follows: 21 (9) with a crossbow unless such crossbow shall consist of a bow and 22 string, either compound or recurve, [that launches a minimum fourteen 23 inch bolt, not including point,] mounted upon a stock with a trigger EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10843-03-5 A. 8330--A 2 1 that holds the string and limbs under tension until released. The trig- 2 ger unit of such crossbow must have a working safety. The [minimum limb 3 width of such crossbow shall be seventeen inches, have a] minimum peak 4 draw weight of such crossbow shall be one hundred pounds [and a maximum 5 peak draw weight of two hundred pounds. The minimum overall length of 6 such crossbow from buttstock to front of limbs shall be twenty-four 7 inches]. 8 § 4. Paragraph a of subdivision 1, paragraphs a and b of subdivision 8 9 and subdivision 10 of section 11-0907 of the environmental conservation 10 law, paragraph a of subdivision 1 as amended and subdivision 10 as added 11 by section 14 and paragraphs a and b of subdivision 8 as amended by 12 section 16 of part EE of chapter 55 of the laws of 2014, are amended to 13 read as follows: 14 a. Wild deer without antlers or having antlers measuring less than 15 three inches in length shall not be taken unless it is taken (1) by long 16 bow in a special long bow season established in subdivision [3] three of 17 this section, or (2) by muzzle-loading firearm [or crossbow] in a 18 special muzzle-loading firearm season established in subdivision [8] 19 eight of this section, or (3) by long bow in Westchester and Suffolk 20 Counties in a year in which a regular season for deer of either sex is 21 established for such counties, or (4) in a special open season for deer 22 of either sex fixed by regulation pursuant to subdivision [5] five or 23 [7] seven of section 11-0903 of this title, or (5) pursuant to a special 24 antlerless deer license in a special open season for antlerless deer in 25 a tract within a Wilderness Hunting Area fixed by regulation pursuant to 26 subdivision [6] six of section 11-0903 of this title, or (6) pursuant to 27 a deer management permit by a person eligible to take such deer pursuant 28 thereto as provided in section 11-0913 of this title, or (7) pursuant to 29 a permit issued to an eligible non-ambulatory person, pursuant to subdi- 30 vision [2] two of section 11-0931 of this title, while in possession of 31 a valid license issued by the department which authorizes the holder to 32 hunt big game. Nothing in this subparagraph shall be construed to limit 33 the power of the department to designate by regulation an area or areas 34 of the state consisting of a county or part of a county where such 35 season shall apply and whether the number of such special permits shall 36 be limited. 37 a. In every area identified in column one of the table set forth in 38 subdivision two of this section, except those areas restricted to 39 special seasons for taking deer by longbow only, special open seasons 40 may be established by regulation for taking deer and/or bear, by the use 41 of muzzle-loading firearms, of not less than .44 caliber shooting a 42 single projectile[, or by the use of a crossbow,] by the holders of a 43 hunting license with a valid muzzle-loading privilege. 44 b. Such special open season for the Southern Zone shall be for the 45 seven day period immediately preceding the regular open season for deer 46 stated in column two of the table set forth in subdivision two of this 47 section, except that the department may, by regulation, fix such open 48 season in the Southern Zone or any portion thereof to be either the 49 seven days immediately preceding or immediately following the regular 50 open season for deer[, provided, however, that any taking of deer or 51 bear by the use of a crossbow in a season or special season in which the 52 muzzle loader is the only firearm permitted shall succeed the regular 53 open hunting season for deer established pursuant to subdivision two of 54 of this section]. 55 10. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, or any prior 56 notwithstanding language in this article, the department may, by regu- A. 8330--A 3 1 lation, authorize the taking of big game by the use of a crossbow by any 2 licensed person in any big game season in any area [designated in items 3 (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), (i), (k) and (l) of paragraph a of subdi- 4 vision two of this section] in which a [shotgun or muzzle loader] long 5 bow is permitted [provided however, that any crossbow use during an 6 archery-only season shall only take place during the last fourteen 7 consecutive days of such archery-only season in the southern zone 8 provided that such archery-only season shall consist of not less than 9 forty-five days and only during the last ten consecutive days of any 10 archery-only season in the northern zone provided that such archery-only 11 season shall consist of no less than twenty-three days. Any muzzle load- 12 ing season which occurs at the same time as a special archery season may 13 only occur during times when crossbows are authorized to be used]. 14 § 5. Section 11-0931 of the environmental conservation law is amended 15 by adding a new subdivision 8 to read as follows: 16 8. a. No person in Westchester, Nassau, or Suffolk county shall 17 discharge a crossbow within five hundred feet of a dwelling house, a 18 farm building or farm structure actually occupied or used, or a school 19 building or playground, public structure, or occupied factory or church. 20 b. A county not enumerated in paragraph a of this subdivision may opt 21 by local law to be covered by the provisions of such paragraph. 22 § 6. This act shall take effect immediately.